Washington statutes.
RCW 43.24.175

Department of licensing wage lien account.

The department of licensing wage lien account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from wage lien filing fees collected by the department of licensing must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only to administer wage lien filings in RCW 60.90.030.

[ 2021 c 102 s 20.]

NOTES:

Short title—Effective date—2021 c 102: See RCW 60.90.900 and 60.90.902.